Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.230

Temporary retirement—Renewal—Fee—Qualification. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

A person licensed under this chapter who desires to retire temporarily from registered nursing practice, advanced registered nursing practice, or licensed practical nursing practice in this state shall send a written notice to the secretary.

Upon receipt of the notice the department shall place the name of the person on inactive status. While remaining on this status the person shall not practice in this state any form of nursing provided for in this chapter. When the person desires to resume practice, the person shall apply to the *commission for renewal of the license and pay a renewal fee to the state treasurer. Persons on inactive status for three years or more must provide evidence of knowledge and skill of current practice as required by the *commission or as provided in this chapter.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 423.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

PDFRCW 18.79.230

Temporary retirement—Renewal—Fee—Qualification. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

A person licensed under this chapter who desires to retire temporarily from registered nursing practice, advanced practice registered nursing, or licensed practical nursing practice in this state shall send a written notice to the secretary.

Upon receipt of the notice the department shall place the name of the person on inactive status. While remaining on this status the person shall not practice in this state any form of nursing provided for in this chapter. When the person desires to resume practice, the person shall apply to the board for renewal of the license and pay a renewal fee to the state treasurer. Persons on inactive status for three years or more must provide evidence of knowledge and skill of current practice as required by the board or as provided in this chapter.

[2024 c 239 s 11; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 423.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.